Maine, session 132, LD1633.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §1303-C, sub-§8-A is enacted to read:
8-A. Construction materials reclamation facility. "Construction materials
reclamation facility" means a facility that exclusively accepts construction and demolition
debris and sorts, refurbishes and sells construction materials reclaimed from the debris for
reuse in construction.
Sec. 2. 38 MRSA §1310-B-2 is enacted to read:
§1310-B-2. Construction materials reclamation facilities
1. Certification. The department shall establish by rule a streamlined process for the
certification of construction materials reclamation facilities. The rules must, at a minimum,
be designed to:
A. Encourage the development and certification of such facilities;
B. Ensure that such facilities meet appropriate safety, environmental and quality
standards;
C. Establish material quality standards for use in construction of reclaimed
construction materials;
D. Establish a program for the certification and training of individuals operating such
facilities; and
E. Provide for transparency in the sourcing of construction and demolition debris and
the resale of reclaimed materials from such facilities.
Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, a construction materials
reclamation facility that receives a certification from the department in accordance with
rules adopted pursuant to this section is not required to obtain a solid waste facility license
under section 1310-N. Rules adopted by the department pursuant to this subsection are
routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
2. Construction Materials Reclamation Fund. The Construction Materials
Reclamation Fund, referred to in this section as "the fund," is a nonlapsing fund established
within the department to provide grants, loans or other funding to any public or private
entity to support the development and certification of construction materials reclamation
facilities, training programs for individuals operating and employed at those facilities and
public outreach and education initiatives regarding those facilities. The fund may accept
revenue from grants, bequests, gifts or contributions from any source, public or private.
3. Education and outreach; community partnerships. In implementing and
administering this section, the department shall implement an education and outreach
program to businesses, contractors and the public regarding the environmental and
economic benefits of construction materials reclamation facilities and shall partner with
community organizations and other entities in the development of training on and best
practices for the reclamation and reuse of construction materials by those facilities. The
department may support its activities under this subsection using funds from the fund.
4. Contractor list. The department shall develop and maintain on its publicly
accessible website a list of and contact information for environmentally responsible general
Page 1 - 132LR1302(01)

412 contractors in the State that the department has determined, based on information submitted
423 by a general contractor or otherwise available to the department, have diverted to certified
434 construction materials reclamation facilities in the prior calendar year at least 50% of the
445 construction and demolition debris generated by the contractor.
5. Report. By January 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the department shall submit
to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over environment and
natural resources matters a report outlining its implementation and administration of this
section. The report must include, but is not limited to, information regarding the
development and certification of construction materials reclamation facilities, funding
received by and issued from the fund and the economic and workforce-related effects in
the State of construction materials reclamation facilities and associated activities. After
reviewing the report, the committee may report out related legislation.
Sec. 3. 38 MRSA §1310-N, first ¶, as repealed and replaced by PL 1993, c. 680,
Pt. A, §37 and amended by PL 2011, c. 682, §38, is amended to read:
No Except for a construction materials reclamation facility certified by the department
pursuant to section 1310-B-2, subsection 1, a person may not locate, establish, construct,
expand the disposal capacity of or operate any solid waste facility unless approved by the
department under the provisions of this chapter. When the proposed facility is located
within the jurisdiction of the Maine Land Use Planning Commission, in addition to any
other requirement, the department shall require compliance with existing standards of the
commission.
Sec. 4. 38 MRSA §2132, sub-§1-C is enacted to read:
1-C. State construction and demolition debris diversion goal. It is the goal of the
State, by January 1, 2036, to reduce by 25% the total tonnage of construction and
demolition debris annually disposed of at solid waste landfills in the State. The baseline
for calculating this reduction is the 2024 solid waste generation and disposal capacity data
gathered by the department.
Sec. 5. 38 MRSA §2132, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2015, c. 461, §5, is further
amended to read:
2. Goal revision. The department shall recommend revisions, if appropriate, to the
state recycling goal and, waste disposal reduction goal and construction and demolition
debris diversion goal established in this section. The department shall submit its
recommendations and any implementing legislation to the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over natural resource matters, which may report out
legislation to implement or otherwise relating to those recommendations.
Sec. 6. 38 MRSA §2203-A, sub-§2-B is enacted to read:
2-B. Construction Materials Reclamation Fund fee. Beginning January 1, 2026, in
addition to the per ton fees required in subsection 1 and subsection 2-A, commercial,
municipal, state-owned and regional association landfills shall collect and pay to the
department a $10 per ton fee for the disposal of construction and demolition debris and
residue from the processing of construction and demolition debris and, notwithstanding
section 2202, this fee must be deposited in the Construction Materials Reclamation Fund
established by section 1310-B-2, subsection 2.
Page 2 - 132LR1302(01)

Sec. 7. Bureau of Revenue Services; reclaimed construction materials tax
credit and deduction. The Department of Administrative and Financial Services,
Bureau of Revenue Services shall develop proposals for implementation of:
1. A refundable tax credit to be made available to a housing developer that purchases
for use in the construction of affordable housing in the State reclaimed construction
materials from a construction materials reclamation facility certified pursuant to the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 38, section 1310-B-2, subsection 1. The credit must be equal to
100% of the documented cost of the reclaimed construction materials purchased by the
developer from a certified construction materials reclamation facility and a person applying
for the credit must, at a minimum, be required to document the purchase of those materials
through submitted receipts or invoices and to establish that the materials were purchased
for use in the construction of affordable housing in the State; and
2. A charitable deduction from individual income tax for individuals or businesses
who donate construction materials to a construction materials reclamation facility that the
facility certifies can be resold by the facility for use in construction.
By January 1, 2026, the bureau shall submit a report setting forth the tax credit and
deduction proposals required under this section, including necessary implementing
legislation along with any related recommendations, to the Joint Standing Committee on
Taxation. After reviewing the report, the committee may report out related legislation to
the Second Regular Session of the 132nd Legislature.
As used in this section, "affordable housing" has the same meaning as in Title 30-A,
section 5002, subsection 2.
Sec. 8. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION, DEPARTMENT OF
Construction Materials Reclamation Fund N508
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to support activities relating to construction materials
reclamation facilities under the Construction Materials Reclamation Fund established in
the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 38, section 1310-B-2, subsection 2.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,000,000 $1,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,000,000 $1,000,000